New Mexico, session 2026, HB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE.--This act may be cited as the "Department of Transportation Appropriation Act of 2026". SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Department of Transportation Appropriation Act of 2026: A. "agency" means an office, department, agency, institution, board, bureau, commission, court, district attorney, council or committee of state government; B. "explanatory" means information that can help users to understand reported performance measures and to evaluate the significance of underlying factors that may have affected the reported information; C. "federal funds" means any payments by the United States government to state government or agencies except those payments made in accordance with the federal Mineral Leasing Act; D. "general fund" means that fund created by Section 6-4-2 NMSA 1978 and includes federal Mineral Leasing Act receipts and those payments made in accordance with the federal block grant and the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 but excludes the general fund operating reserve, the appropriation contingency fund, the tax stabilization reserve and any other fund, reserve or account from which general appropriations are restricted by law; E. "interagency transfers" means revenue, other than internal service funds, legally transferred from one agency to another; F. "internal service funds" means: (1) revenue transferred to an agency for the financing of goods or services to another agency on a cost-reimbursement basis; and (2) balances in agency internal service fund accounts appropriated by the Department of Transportation Appropriation Act of 2026; G. "other state funds" means: (1) nonreverting balances in agency accounts, other than in internal service fund accounts, appropriated by the Department of Transportation Appropriation Act of 2026; (2) all revenue available to agencies from sources other than the general fund, internal service fund accounts, interagency transfers and federal funds; and (3) all revenue, the use of which is restricted by statute or agreement; H. "outcome" means the measure of the actual impact or public benefit of a program; I. "output" means the measure of the volume of work completed or the level of actual services or products delivered by a program; J. "performance measure" means a quantitative or qualitative indicator used to assess a program; K. "quality" means the measure of the quality of a good or service produced and is often an indicator of the timeliness, reliability or safety of services or products produced by a program; L. "revenue" means all money received by an agency from sources external to that agency, net of refunds and other correcting transactions, other than from issue of debt, liquidation of investments or as agent or trustee for other governmental entities or private persons; and M. "target" means the expected level of performance of a program's performance measures. SECTION 3. FORMAT.--The general format of the appropriations set forth in the Department of Transportation Appropriation Act of 2026 with respect to symbols used, column headings and stating of amounts is that used in the General Appropriation Act of 2025. SECTION 4. FISCAL YEAR 2027 APPROPRIATIONS.-- DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION: (1) Project design and construction: The purpose of the project design and construction program is to provide improvements and additions to the state's highway infrastructure to serve the interest of the general public. These improvements include those activities directly related to highway planning, design and construction necessary for a complete system of highways in the state. Appropriations: (a)  Personal services and employee benefits                        36,358.3                  1,873.3      38,231.6 (b)  Contractual services                      3,294.6                                3,294.6 (c)  Other 1,511.1                                1,511.1 (d)  Plan, study, design, right- of-way acquisition, road construction and rehabilitation                           93,802.9                462,563.3     556,366.2 (e)  Transportation project fund                                     55,790.0                               55,790.0       (f)  Local governments road fund                                     28,965.0                               28,965.0 (g)  Debt service                             53,385.3                 69,703.4     123,088.7 Subtotal                                      273,107.2                534,140.0     807,247.2 Performance measures: (a)  Outcome:   Percent of projects in production let to bid as scheduled                       75% (b)  Quality:   Percent of final cost-over-bid amount, less gross receipts tax, on highway construction projects                                            3% (c)  Outcome:   Percent of projects completed according to schedule                             88% (2) Highway operations: The highway operations program is responsible for maintaining and providing improvements to the state's highway infrastructure that serve the interest of the general public. The maintenance and improvements include those activities directly related to preserving roadway integrity and maintaining open highway access throughout the state system. Some examples include bridge maintenance and inspection, snow removal, chip sealing, erosion repair, right-of-way mowing and litter pick up, among numerous other activities. Appropriations: (a)  Personal services and employee benefits                        164,545.2                   3,000.0     167,545.2 (b)  Contractual services                       1,647.4                                 1,647.4 (c)  Other 42,103.9                                42,103.9 (d)  Roadway maintenance contracts                                 61,602.3                                61,602.3 (e)  Roadway maintenance supplies and materials                    38,394.2                                38,394.2 (f)  Equipment purchases                       10,043.3                                10,043.3 Subtotal                                      318,336.3                   3,000.0     321,336.3 Performance measures: (a)  Output:    Number of statewide pavement lane miles preserved                             3,500 (b)  Outcome:   Percent of interstate lane miles rated fair or better                           91% (c)  Outcome:   Number of combined systemwide lane miles in poor condition                    4,000 (d)  Outcome:   Percent of bridges in fair, or better, condition based on deck area                                                                       95% (3) Program support: The purpose of program support is to provide management and administration of financial and human resources, custody and maintenance of information and property and the management of construction and maintenance projects. Appropriations: (a)  Personal services and employee benefits                         37,759.1                                37,759.1 (b)  Contractual services                       1,800.0                                 1,800.0 (c)  Other 16,223.2                                16,223.2 Subtotal                                       55,782.3                                55,782.3 Performance measures: (a)  Explanatory:                       Vacancy rate of all programs (4) Modal: The purpose of the modal program is to provide federal grants management and oversight of programs with dedicated revenues, including transit and rail, traffic safety and aviation. Appropriations: (a)  Personal services and employee benefits                          3,949.7      7,180.0      1,858.3      12,988.0 (b)  Contractual services                      20,026.2        700.0     12,712.9      33,439.1 (c)  Other                                      2,345.7      1,120.0      5,108.5       8,574.2 (d)  Air service assistance program                                    9,785.6                                 9,785.6 (e)  Transit grants                                                      33,226.3      33,226.3 Subtotal                                       36,107.2      9,000.0     52,906.0      98,013.2 The internal service funds/interagency transfer appropriations to the modal program of the department of transportation include eight million seven hundred thousand dollars ($8,700,000) from the weight distance tax identification permit fund. Performance measures: (a)  Outcome:   Number of traffic fatalities                                                    400 (b)  Outcome:   Number of alcohol-related traffic fatalities                                   140. TOTAL TRANSPORTATION 683,333.0     9,000.0 590,046.0 1,282,379.0 - 6 -